North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Part 1A. Disclosure Requirements for Media Advertisements.

§ 163-278.38Z.
Definitions.

As used in this Part:

“Advertisement” means any message appearing in the print media, on television, or on radio that constitutes a contribution or expenditure under this Article.

“Candidate” means any individual who, with respect to a public office listed in G.S. 163-278.6(80), has filed a notice of candidacy, notice of retention, or a petition requesting to be a candidate, or has been certified as a nominee of a political party
for a vacancy, or has otherwise qualified as a candidate in a manner authorized by law, or has filed a statement of organization under

G.S. 163-278.7

and is required to file periodic financial disclosure statements under

G.S. 163-278.9

.

“Candidate campaign committee” means any political committee organized by or under the direction of a candidate, except for an affiliated party committee as defined in

G.S. 163-278.6(1)

.

“Full-screen” means the only picture appearing on the television screen during the oral disclosure statement contains the disclosing person, that the picture occupies all visible space on the television screen, and that the image of the disclosing person
occupies at least fifty percent (50%) of the vertical height of the television screen.

“Political action committee” has the same meaning as “political committee” in G.S. 163-278.6(74), except that “political action committee” does not include any political party, political party organization, or affiliated party committee.

“Political party organization” means any political party executive committee or any political committee that operates under the direction of a political party executive committee or political party chair, or any affiliated party committee.

“Print media” means billboards, cards, newspapers, newspaper inserts, magazines, mass mailings, pamphlets, fliers, periodicals, and outdoor advertising facilities.

“Radio” means any radio broadcast station that is subject to the provisions of 47 U.S.C. §§ 315 and 317.

“Scan line” means a standard term of measurement used in the electronic media industry calculating a certain area in a television advertisement.

“Sponsor” means a candidate, candidate committee, political party organization, political action committee, referendum committee, individual, or other entity that purchases an advertisement.

“Television” means any television broadcast station, cable television system, wireless-cable multipoint distribution system, satellite company, or telephone company transmitting video programming that is subject to the provisions of 47 U.S.C. §§ 315 and
317.

“Unobscured” means the only printed material that may appear on the television screen is a visual disclosure statement required by law, and nothing is blocking the view of the disclosing person’s face.

History.
1999-453, s. 2(a); 2004-203, s. 12(a); 2010-170, s. 7; 2015-66, s. 8(b); 2015-258, s. 3(q); 2015-264, s. 81(f); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Preclearance under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act.

Session Laws 2010-170, s. 17, provides, in part: “Sections 1 through 15 of this act become effective upon preclearance by the United States Department of Justice.” Preclearance was received by letter dated September 23, 2010.

§ 163-278.39.
Basic disclosure requirements for all political advertisements.

Basic Requirements. — It shall be unlawful for any sponsor to sponsor an advertisement in the print media or on radio or television that constitutes an expenditure, independent expenditure, electioneering communication, or contribution required to be
disclosed under this Article unless all the following conditions are met:

It bears the legend or includes the statement: “Paid for by _______________ [Name of candidate, candidate campaign committee, political party organization, political action committee, referendum committee, individual, or other sponsor].” In television
advertisements, this disclosure shall be made by visual legend.

The name used in the labeling required in subdivision (1) of this subsection is the name that appears on the statement of organization as required in G.S. 163-278.7(b)(1) or G.S. 163-278.12(a).

In a print media advertisement supporting or opposing the nomination or election of one or more clearly identified candidates, the sponsor states whether it is authorized by a candidate. The visual legend in the advertisement shall state either “Authorized
by [name of candidate], candidate for [name of office]” or “Not authorized by a candidate.” This subdivision does not apply if the sponsor of the advertisement is the candidate the advertisement supports or that candidate’s
campaign committee.

In a print media advertisement that identifies a candidate the sponsor is opposing, the sponsor discloses in the advertisement the name of the candidate who is intended to benefit from the advertisement. This subdivision applies only when the sponsor
coordinates or consults about the advertisement or the expenditure for it with the candidate who is intended to benefit.If an advertisement described in this section is jointly sponsored, the disclosure statement shall
name all the sponsors.

Size Requirements. — In a print media advertisement covered by subsection (a) of this section, the height of all disclosure statements required by that subsection shall constitute at least five percent (5%) of the height of the printed space of the advertisement,
provided that the type shall in no event be less than 12 points in size. In an advertisement in a newspaper or a newspaper insert, the total height of the disclosure statement need not constitute five percent of the printed space
of the advertisement if the type of the disclosure statement is at least 28 points in size. If a single advertisement consists of multiple pages, folds, or faces, the disclosure requirement of this section applies only to one page,
fold, or face. In a television advertisement covered by subsection (a) of this section, the visual disclosure legend shall constitute four percent (4%) of vertical picture height in size, and where the television advertisement
that appears is paid for by a candidate or candidate campaign committee, the visual disclosure legend shall appear simultaneously with an easily identifiable photograph of the candidate for at least two seconds. In a radio advertisement
covered by subsection (a) of this section, the disclosure statement shall last at least two seconds, provided the statement is spoken so that its contents may be easily understood.

Misrepresentation of Authorization. — Notwithstanding

G.S. 163-278.27(a)

, any candidate, candidate campaign committee, political party organization, political action committee, referendum committee, individual, or other sponsor making an advertisement in the print media or on radio or
television bearing any legend required by subsection (a) of this section that misrepresents the sponsorship or authorization of the advertisement is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.
1999-453, s. 2(a); 2001-317, s. 1; 2001-353, s. 5; 2010-170, s. 8; 2013-381, ss. 44.2, 56.1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Preclearance under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act.

Session Laws 2010-170, s. 17, provides, in part: “Sections 1 through 15 of this act become effective upon preclearance by the United States Department of Justice.” Preclearance was received by letter dated September 23, 2010.

§ 163-278.39A.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-381, s. 44.1, effective January 1, 2014.

History.
1999-453, s. 2(a); 2000-140, ss. 83, 84; 2001-317, s. 2; 2010-170, s. 9; repealed by 2013-381, s. 44.1, effective January 1, 2014.

§ 163-278.39B.

Recodified as

G.S. 163-278.38

Z by Session Laws 2004-203, s. 12(a), effective August 17, 2004.

§ 163-278.39C.
Scope of disclosure requirements.

The disclosure requirements of this Part apply to any sponsor of an advertisement in the print media or on radio or television the cost or value of which constitutes an expenditure or contribution required to be disclosed under this Article, except that
the disclosure requirements of this Part:

Do not apply to an individual who makes uncoordinated independent expenditures aggregating less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) in a political campaign; and

Do not apply to an individual who incurs expenses with respect to a referendum.The disclosure requirements of this Part do not apply to any advertisement the expenditure for which is required to be disclosed by

G.S. 163-278.12

A alone and by no other law.

History.
1999-453, s. 2(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).